Wisconsin, session 2025, AB228.
do enact as follows:AB228,13Section 1. 66.1105 (17) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB228,2,1166.1105 (17) (c) Data center districts. 1. In this paragraph:AB228,2,22a. “Data center” means a qualified data center certified under s. 238.40 (2).AB228,2,43b. “Data center district” means a tax incremental district that contains within 4its boundaries a data center.AB228,2,852. If all project costs of a data center district are related to a data center 6located within the district, the 12 percent limit findings requirement described 7under sub. (4) (gm) 4. c. does not apply to the creation of the data center district or 8the amendment of a project plan for the data center district.AB228,2,1293. No project plan of a data center district that was excepted under subd. 2. 10from the 12 percent findings requirement described under sub. (4) (gm) 4. c. may be 11amended to include project costs not related to a data center located within the 12district.AB228,2,16134. When the local legislative body makes a calculation under sub. (4) (gm) 4. c. 14for a tax incremental district, the calculation may not include the value increment 15of any data center district that was excepted under subd. 2. from the 12 percent 16findings requirement described under sub. (4) (gm) 4. c.AB228,2,1717